dictsource/ay_rules
// This file is UTF-8 encoded
// translation rules for Aymara

.replace
        ʼ       '     // replace modified apostrophe to simple apostrophe

.group a
        a       a

.group ch
        ch      tS
        ch'     tS`?
        chh     tSh

.group i
        i       i

.group ï
        ï       i:

.group j
        j        x

.group k
        k       k
        k'      k`?
        kh      k#

.group l
        l       l
        ll      l^

.group m
        m       m

.group n
        n       n

.group ñ
        ñ       n^

.group p
        p       p
        p'      p`?
        ph      p#

.group q
        q       q
        q'      q`?
        qh      qh

.group r
        r       *

.group s
        s       s

.group t
       t       t
       t'      t`?
       th      t#

.group u
        u       u

.group ü
        ü       u:

.group w
        w       w

.group x
        x       X

.group y
        y       j
